Utah statutes.
58-60-206.   Qualifications for admission to examination.

All applicants for admission to an examination qualifying an individual for licensure under this part shall, before taking the examination:

(1)  submit an application for examination on a form provided by the division;

(2)  pay the fee established for the examination; and

(3)  certify under penalty of perjury as evidenced by notarized signature on the application for examination that the applicant:

(a)  has completed the education requirement and been awarded the earned degree required for licensure; or

(b)  has only one semester, or the equivalent, remaining before the applicant completes the education requirement for earning the degree that is required for licensure.



Amended by Chapter 262, 2013 General Session

